Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 14. Economically Needed Diversity Options for Wyoming (ENDOW) Executive Council

§ 9-12-1401.
Economically needed diversity options for Wyoming executive council; creation; appointment and terms of members.

There is created the economically needed diversity options for Wyoming (ENDOW) executive council. The members shall represent existing, new and emerging economic sectors or subsectors or have demonstrated executive level experience. The council shall consist of not more than twenty (20) voting members, appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The presiding officers of the house and senate and the chairmen of the house and senate minerals, business and economic development committees shall be ex officio, nonvoting members. The governor may remove any appointed member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. If an appointed member’s position is vacant the governor shall appoint a new member as provided in W.S.

28-12-101

. The governor, or his designee, shall be a member and chairman of the council, but shall not vote. The council shall elect a vice-chairman from among the appointed members. One-half plus one (1) of the appointed members shall have initial terms of four (4) years and the remaining members shall have initial terms of two (2) years. Thereafter, appointed members shall serve for terms of four (4) years.

In appointing members the governor shall, to the extent practicable, provide for diversity of members based upon existing, new and emerging economic sectors and subsectors. No more than two (2) members shall be appointed to serve concurrently from the same economic subsector.

Members of the council shall not receive compensation for their services, but when engaged in the performance of their duties, they may receive travel expenses, per diem and mileage expenses in the same manner and amount as employees of the state.

The council shall meet as often as necessary to conduct business. Meetings shall be called by the cochairmen. A majority of the voting members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business or the exercise of any power or function of the council.

The council shall be administered by the office of the governor and staffed and supported by the Wyoming business council, community college commission, University of Wyoming and department of workforce services. The council shall, where appropriate and authorized by the governor, make use of the services and facilities of other departments, boards, commissions and agencies of the state of Wyoming.

As used in this article:

“Business development and innovation zone” means defined geographic areas within the state in which local, state and federal permitting and other regulatory requirements will be met for all or significant segments of industry located in the zone or in which industries or businesses would be benefitted substantially as a result of being located in proximity to each other;

“Economic sector” and “economic subsector” means a primary business activity identified respectively as a sector or subsector in the most recent edition of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) manual.

History.

2017 ch. 140, § 2, effective March 3, 2017; 2018 ch. 125, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (a), substituted “more than twenty (20) voting” for “more than fifteen (15) voting” in the third sentence, “member and chairman of the council” for “member and cochairman of the council” in the seventh sentence, and “elect a vice-chairman from among” for “elect a cochairman from among” in the eighth sentence.

Laws 2018, ch. 125, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2017, Ch. 140, § 3, states as follows: “Notwithstanding
W.S. 9-12-1401(a) and

28-12-101

, senate confirmation of the appointed members of the economically needed diversity options for Wyoming executive council shall not be required until the 2018 legislative session.”

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018,
ch. 125, § 2, provides: “Notwithstanding
W.S. 9-12-1401(a), of
the additional five (5) members appointed to the ENDOW council pursuant
to this act, two (2) members shall be appointed for an initial term
ending March 31, 2021 and three (3) members shall be appointed for
an initial term ending March 31, 2023.”

Effective Date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 140 § 5 , makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 3, 2017.

§ 9-12-1402.
General powers and duties of the council; economic diversification policy and strategy; authority of governor.

The ENDOW executive council shall:

Receive and evaluate public input, opinions and recommendations regarding the diversification of Wyoming’s economy and advise the governor and legislature of any findings or recommendations. The council shall seek the advice of departments, boards, commissions and agencies of the state of Wyoming;

By August 30, 2017, prepare and submit to the governor and legislature through the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee, an exhaustive assessment of socioeconomic data, which shall include an examination of state and local fiscal sustainability, existing, new and emerging economic sectors and subsectors of the economy, identification of potential business development and innovation zones, an inventory of existing workforce strengths and deficiencies, economic trends and key enablers for economic growth in the state that translate to viable business development;

By December 31, 2017, prepare and submit to the governor and legislature a report of its preliminary findings and recommendations in the development of a comprehensive economic diversification strategy. The preliminary report shall evaluate investments necessary to support new and emerging industries or economic sectors, knowledge transfer, infrastructure, international trade, and cooperation between the public sector and private enterprise, assess the relationship between incremental state and local tax revenues, costs of public services and economic diversification and make recommendations as appropriate. The report shall identify specific areas which should be designated as business development and innovation zones. In identifying potential zones the report shall review the establishment of zones including, but not limited to, industries involving agriculture and agricultural business, renewable energy sources, advanced clean coal technologies, nuclear fuel processing and enrichment, hybrid energy sources, enhanced oil recovery, inland distribution ports, international trade, food and beverage industry distribution, promotion, marketing and development of the international trust and fiduciary business and related sectors, emerging research and technological development, existing, new and emerging economic sectors and subsectors, and value added manufacturing involving Wyoming resources. The potential zones shall be described by location in the state, including recommended boundaries. The report shall also identify existing industries in these areas which could be expanded and used to attract other businesses in the same, related or mutually supporting industries. The report shall identify existing deficiencies and strengths in Wyoming’s workforce and workforce training programs;

By August 1, 2018, prepare and submit to the governor for his approval a twenty (20) year comprehensive economic diversification strategy. The strategy shall contain explicit economic targets to guide the evolution of Wyoming’s economy in order to build a sustainable and diversified, value added economy by 2038. The strategy shall identify agency specific or collective actions that can be implemented immediately without new state appropriations and resources and agency specific and collective actions that will require new state appropriations or reallocation of state resources. The strategy shall address the creation of business development and innovation zones and plans to implement the zones. The council may recommend to the governor modifications to the twenty (20) year plan from time to time as it deems advisable;

In coordination with departments, boards, commissions and agencies of the state of Wyoming, develop four (4) year action plans with performance benchmarks, including policy recommendations and budget requests. Each plan shall specify a time period for creating business development and innovation zones within the plan’s four (4) year period and a time schedule for full implementation of steps necessary to establish each zone. The council shall submit each action plan to the governor for his approval. After approval by the governor, the council shall, in coordination with departments, boards, commissions and agencies of the state, implement the action plan and provide regular progress reports in meeting targets and shall identify adjustments to be made to the governor and legislature;

Review with the Wyoming business council, community college commission, University of Wyoming, the department of workforce services, and other state agency directors as determined by the governor and ENDOW executive council to be necessary or desirable, agency enabling legislation, rules and regulations, policies, procedures and other governing mechanisms to determine amendments which would better align agency functions with the economic diversification strategy and to allow for implementation of business development and innovation zones;

Engage the private sector in review of state laws, rules and regulations, policies, procedures and other governing mechanisms that inhibit economic diversification efforts, including those which stand as obstacles to the implementation of business development and innovation zones, in order to determine amendments to the same without compromising Wyoming’s environmental and workplace standards;

Have the authority to contract with consultants through the Wyoming business council for rendering of professional, financial and technical assistance and advice, including for studies and investigation likely to lead to economic diversification;

At the request of the governor, review and make recommendations to the governor for approval on projects submitted for grant and other funding opportunities from nonstate sources which support the economic diversification strategy;

Conduct studies to identify services, facilities and amenities that are attractive to businesses and their employees seeking to relocate but which are substantially lacking or deficient in Wyoming, and identify potential solutions to address those deficiencies to create working and community life climates attractive to a modern day workforce;

Develop a performance evaluation system, monitor progress and report to the governor the status of programs and activities outlined as goals, objectives or action items in the state’s economic diversification strategy;

In consultation with the University of Wyoming, community colleges, the department of education, department of workforce services and Wyoming business council, review existing career technical education programs and develop recommendations regarding opportunities to better coordinate existing public and private programs, and develop or acquire existing career technical education facilities to further technical education opportunities in the state. The recommendations shall be included in the council’s twenty (20) year economic diversification strategy and may be included in the council’s four (4) year action plan as determined appropriate by the council.

In carrying out his duties under this article the governor, in consultation with the presiding officers of the legislature, may convene advisors to obtain objective advice in the formulation of economic diversification policy, including assessing local, national and global conditions and trends and evaluating the significance of those factors relative to Wyoming.

History.

2017 ch. 140, § 2, effective March 3, 2017; 2018 ch. 125, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

added (a)(xii).

Laws 2018, ch. 125, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Effective Date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 140 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 3, 2017.

§ 9-12-1403.
Coordinator of economic diversification; duties.

The governor shall designate a coordinator of economic diversification, who shall be a qualified elector of the state and who may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The coordinator shall:

Provide administrative support for the ENDOW executive council;

Direct and oversee the execution of Wyoming’s economic diversification strategies and initiatives and the advancement of the interests of Wyoming in policy, program and project development and implementation to support diversification of the economy of Wyoming. Unless law directs a different state entity to undertake those programs and projects the coordinator may initiate or implement those programs and projects;

Coordinate activities with the Wyoming business council, community college commission, University of Wyoming, department of workforce services, Wyoming department of transportation, department of environmental quality, office of state lands and investments and other departments, boards, commissions, authorities and agencies of the state of Wyoming to assure efficient use of state resources in execution of Wyoming’s economic diversification strategy;

Compile detailed information on all programs and projects undertaken for the purpose of measuring trends, development and progress in the diversification of the economy of Wyoming;

Initiate, implement, sponsor, promote and coordinate policy research, policy development and economic analysis to support diversification of the economy of Wyoming;

Where appropriate and authorized by the governor, make use of the services and facilities of other departments, boards, commissions and agencies of the state of Wyoming.

History.

2017 ch. 140, § 2, effective March 3, 2017.

Effective Date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 140 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 3, 2017.

§ 9-12-1404.
Economic diversification account created; authorized expenditures.

There is created an economic diversification account. All monies in the account are continuously appropriated to the office of the governor to be used for the purposes of this article and as otherwise specified by law, including per diem, mileage and other administrative expenses of the ENDOW executive council. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

and

9-4-207

, funds in the account or subaccounts of the account shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal period. Interest earned on funds in the account shall be deposited to the account or appropriate subaccount. Within the account shall be subaccounts. For accounting and investment purposes only all subaccounts shall be treated as separate accounts. The subaccounts are as follows:

The agriculture marketing subaccount. Funds within this subaccount may be expended as requested by the Wyoming business council and approved by the governor or his designee to provide funding for purposes of W.S.

9-12-109

and as specified by law;

The broadband development subaccount. Funds within this subaccount may be expended as requested by the Wyoming business council and approved by the governor or his designee to provide funding for agreements entered into pursuant to W.S.

9-12-1501

through

9-12-1510

;

The Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector partnership subaccount. Funds within this subaccount may be expended:

As approved by director of the department of workforce services for administrative costs incurred by the department of workforce services associated with administration of the Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector partnership program under W.S.

9-2-2609

through

9-2-2611

; and

As approved by the governor or his designee to provide funding for agreements entered into pursuant to W.S.

9-2-2609

through

9-2-2611

;

The Wyoming research and innovation subaccount. Funds within this subaccount may be expended as requested by the Wyoming business council and approved by the governor or his designee to provide funding for agreements entered into pursuant to W.S.

9-12-1405

;

The “startup:Wyoming” subaccount. Funds within this subaccount may be expended as requested by the Wyoming business council and approved by the governor or his designee to provide funding pursuant to W.S. 9-12-105(b) through (f).

The governor may accept, and shall deposit to the account, or to the appropriate subaccount within the account, any gifts, contributions, donations, grants or federal funds specifically designated for purposes of this article or other ENDOW related program.

History.

2017 ch. 140, § 2, effective March 3, 2017; 2018 ch. 125, § 1, effective March 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 126, § 2, effective March 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 127, § 2, effective March 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 128, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 139, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 125, § 1, in (a), deleted “solely” following “governor to be used,” inserted “and as otherwise specified by law” in the second sentence, added “or appropriate subaccount” at the end of the fourth sentence, and added the last two sentences; added (a)(i); and in (b), inserted “or to the appropriate subaccount within the account” and added “or other ENDOW related program” at the end.

Laws 2018, ch. 125, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 126, § 2, in (a), deleted “solely” following “governor to be used,” inserted “and as otherwise specified by law” and added “or appropriate subaccount” at the end of the fourth sentence, and added the last two sentences; added (a)(i); and in (b), inserted “or to the appropriate subaccount within the account” and added “or other ENDOW related program” at the end.

Laws 2018, ch. 126, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

The third 2018 amendment, by ch. 127, § 2, in (a), deleted “solely” following “governor to be used” and inserted “and as otherwise specified by law” in the second sentence, inserted “or subaccounts of the account” and added “or appropriate subaccount” in the third sentence, and added the last two sentences; added (a)(i) and (ii); and in (b), inserted “or to the appropriate subaccount within the account” and added “or other ENDOW related program.”

Laws 2018, ch. 127, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

The fourth 2018 amendment, by ch. 128, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), deleted “solely” following “governor to be used” and inserted “and as otherwise specified by law” in the second sentence; added “or appropriate subaccount” at the end of the fourth sentence, and added the last two sentences; added (a)(i); and in (b), inserted “or to the appropriate subaccount within the account” and added “or other ENDOW related program” at the end.

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(iv), substituted "W.S.

9-12-1405

" for "W.S.

9-12-408

."

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i) added “and as specified by law” at the end.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "9-12-1510" for "9-12-1508" in (a)(ii).

Effective Date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 140 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 3, 2017.

§ 9-12-1405.
Wyoming research and innovation program fund created; authorized expenditures from the fund; rulemaking.

The council shall administer a Wyoming research and innovation program under which matching funds necessary to access federal research and development grant funds or other nonstate funds may be provided as specified in this section. To be eligible to receive funding under the program an entity shall present to the council its proposal to apply for or an existing application for an externally funded grant specific to a priority economic sector identified in the approved twenty (20) year comprehensive economic diversification strategy under W.S. 9-12-1402(a)(iv). The entity shall demonstrate that further research funding from nonstate funds is likely to be provided if funding is provided under this section.

The Wyoming business council, in consultation with the ENDOW executive council and the University of Wyoming shall promulgate rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The rules shall include but not be limited to application procedures, eligibility requirements, the amount of funding which may be provided for any single project, provision for ensuring adequate consideration to the state in exchange for funding any project which does not solely involve a state agency or institution or political subdivision of the state, recapture of funding if the recipient of funds breaches any agreement under the program and prioritization for funding requests. In establishing provisions for adequate consideration to the state, the council may include, but is not limited to, assessment of the following:

The potential for the creation of a high–growth company and number of new jobs created;

The amount of nonstate or private financing leveraged to be used by the business in Wyoming;

Potential increase in Wyoming based patents;

Increase in Wyoming higher education institutions’ capacity to respond to new research developments.

History.

2018 ch. 127, § 1, effective March 14, 2018; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-12-408

by 2019 ch. 186, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 127, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.